Missouri, session 2026, HB1624.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 263.070 and 266.031, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 263.070 and 266.031, to read as follows:
263.070. 1. A schedule of fees to defray the cost of inspecting greenhouses,
nurseries, nursery dealers, nursery stock, plants, plant products and other materials is hereby
established and shall be listed in the rules made pursuant to sections 263.010 to 263.180. This
fee schedule may be revised from time to time to more accurately reflect the actual cost of
these inspections.
2. Greenhouse inspection shall be optional and any grower of greenhouse plants who
may desire or find need for a certificate of greenhouse inspection may obtain semiannual
inspection of his greenhouse, premises and plants, by making application to the state
entomologist. This semiannual inspection and certification of greenhouses shall be
performed under the same general provisions as apply to the annual inspection of
nurseries. Greenhouse inspection certificates shall expire on November thirtieth of each year.
3. All nurseries in this state shall be inspected at least once each year to ascertain
whether they are infested or infected with plant pests and shall comply with the affidavit
requirements under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of this section. Upon full
payment of the fee and submission of the affidavit each nurseryman shall receive a written
notice of the findings of such inspection along with a nursery inspection certificate; except
that, the state entomologist may withhold certification of a nursery pending eradication of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1624 2
extremely serious or abundant plant pests or weeds of such nature which would prevent the
adequate inspection of such nursery. This certificate shall be used in connection with the
shipment or movement of any nursery stock shown to be apparently free of harmful and
destructive plant pests or other nursery stock from which harmful and destructive plant pests
have been eliminated. All nursery inspection certificates shall expire on September thirtieth
of each year. Each nursery shall be allowed one retail sales outlet per certificate. Additional
outlets shall require separate nursery dealer registration-inspection certificates. When the
findings of the annual inspection of a nursery shall in the opinion of the state entomologist
warrant such action, additional inspections of the nursery may be made and the nursery may
be charged a fee sufficient to cover the cost of such reinspection.
4. By notice in writing the state entomologist may require a nurseryman to hold any
variety or any amount of nursery stock for inspection or reinspection by quarantining such
nursery stock whenever such action is necessary to determine that it is free from pests or to
allow time to eradicate any such pests. The state entomologist may further order the removal
from sale and the treatment or destruction of any nursery stock infested or infected with
especially injurious pests or nursery stock which is not viable or is in such damaged or
desiccated condition as to be incapable of reasonable growth. No compensation shall be paid
for any stock ordered destroyed.
5. (1) Each nursery dealer, before selling or offering for sale or otherwise distributing
nursery stock within this state, shall annually obtain a nursery dealers' registration-inspection
certificate for each individual location from which the dealer sells or offers for sale nursery
stock. Each nursery dealer shall make application on forms to be provided by the state
entomologist for each individual location, which shall include:
(a) The name and complete address of the nursery dealer's place of business for which
such certificate is requested;
(b) A declaration that applicant will obtain and distribute only inspected and certified
nursery stock;
(c) An up-to-date listing of all sources from which the nursery dealer secures nursery
stock; and
(d) An affidavit that the nursery dealer shall not knowingly and intentionally import,
export, buy, sell, transport, distribute, or propagate any viable plant portion or seeds of:
a. Climbing euonymus (Euonymus [fortune] fortunei variety Coloratus), all varieties
and cultivars of Japanese honeysuckle (Lonicera japonica), or all varieties and cultivars of
Sericea lespedeza (Lespedeza cuneata), or [perilla] Perilla mint ([perilla] Perilla frutescens)
on or after January 1, 2027; or
b. Burning bush (Euonymus alatus 'Compactus') or all varieties and cultivars of
Callery pear (Pyrus calleryana) on or after January 1, 2029.

HB 1624 3
(2) Each nursery dealer shall pay, at the time of making application, the annual
registration-inspection fee as set forth in the rules made pursuant to sections 263.010 to
263.180.
(3) All nursery dealer registration-inspection certificates shall expire on September
thirtieth of each year.
(4) The state entomologist may inspect or cause to be inspected the premises of any
nursery dealer including any sales yard, packing shed, nursery stock on hand or equipment,
for the presence of dangerous and destructive plant pests which may be disseminated on
nursery stock.
6. By notice in writing the state entomologist may require a nursery dealer to hold any
variety or any amount of nursery stock by quarantining such nursery stock whenever such
action is necessary to determine that it is free from pests or to allow time to eradicate any such
pests. The state entomologist may further order the removal from sale and the treatment or
destruction of any nursery stock infested or infected with especially injurious pests, or nursery
stock which is not viable or is in such damaged or desiccated condition as to be incapable of
reasonable growth. No compensation shall be paid for any stock ordered destroyed.
7. Any person in need of a special inspection and certification of nursery stock, other
plants or plant products may upon request to the state entomologist have same inspected for
plant pests. A fee sufficient to cover the cost of such inspection or certificate, or both, may be
charged. Upon completion of the inspection and payment of the fee, a certificate of
inspection shall be issued provided the plants or plant products are free of harmful plant pests.
The state entomologist may enter into agreements with various persons or companies, to carry
out the requirements of this state and importing states or countries.
8. All moneys received for any inspection fee or other receipts under this law shall be
deposited in the state treasury and shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly.
266.031. 1. Any person who sells, distributes, offers or exposes for sale any
agricultural or vegetable seed in the state of Missouri shall obtain a seed permit from the
director of agriculture unless exempted as in section 266.080. Seed dealers must purchase
permits for each seed sales classification performed, selling or taking orders for seed from
other than an established place of business, selling seed from a retail place of business, selling
seed from a wholesale place of business, or negotiating sales as a broker. A separate permit
shall be required for each place of business from which seed regulated by this law is sold. A
separate permit shall also be required of each person selling or taking orders for seed from
other than an established place of business. Seed permit fees will be assessed as follows:
(1) Place of business selling vegetable seed packets
of one pound or less or lawn seed packages to the
end user $20.00

HB 1624 4
(2) Person that sells only labeled seed grown on their
own property $20.00
(3) Retail place of business or person not otherwise
identified that sells or offers for sale agricultural
seed or offers for sale agricultural seed or bulk
vegetable seed to the end user and which does not
provide storage facilities $20.00
(4) Retail place of business or person not otherwise
identified that sells or offers for sale agricultural
seed or offers for sale agricultural seed or bulk
vegetable seed to the end user and which
provides storage facilities. A permit to sell
agricultural or bulk vegetable seed will suffice
for selling seed as listed in (1) and (2) $60.00
(5) Wholesale place of business selling labeled seed
for resale, or negotiating sales as a seed broker $400.00
2. An application for a seed permit or an application for renewal of any seed
permit shall include an affidavit that the person who sells, distributes, offers, or exposes
for sale any agricultural or vegetable seed in the state of Missouri shall not knowingly
and intentionally import, export, buy, sell, transport, distribute, or propagate any viable
plant portion or seeds of:
(1) Climbing euonymus (Euonymus fortunei variety Coloratus), all varieties and
cultivars of Japanese honeysuckle (Lonicera japonica), or all varieties and cultivars of
Sericea lespedeza (Lespedeza cuneata), or Perilla mint (Perilla frutescens) on or after
January 1, 2027; or
(2) Burning bush (Euonymus alatus 'Compactus') or all varieties and cultivars
of Callery pear (Pyrus calleryana) on or after January 1, 2029.
3. Farmers and seed producers shall be classed as seedsmen and must comply with all
the provisions of sections 266.011 to 266.111 when the farmers or seed producers:
(1) Offer, sell or expose for sale seed not of their own production;
(2) Sell and deliver seed to a purchaser by way of common carrier;
(3) Sell seed by any public sales service;
(4) Advertise or label seed referring to the purity or germination.
[3.] 4. No permit is transferable. All persons holding a Missouri seed permit shall
post the permit in a conspicuous place in the place of business to which it applies. The
licensing year shall be twelve months, or any fraction thereof, beginning on January first and

HB 1624 5
ending December thirty-first. All permit fees shall be paid to the Missouri department of
agriculture and shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the agriculture
protection fund created in section 261.200.
[4.] 5. If the application for renewal of any seed permit is not filed prior to expiration
date in any year, a penalty of fifty percent shall be assessed and added to the original fee and
shall be paid by the applicant before that renewal license shall be issued; provided, that such
penalty shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not
engaged in selling, distributing, offering or exposing seed for sale, subsequent to the
expiration date of his or her license.
✔